Colorado, session 2025B, SB25B-003.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(a) In July 2025, the United States Congress passed, and the
president signed into law, a federal budget bill, Pub.L. 119-21, that
significantly reduced funding for the supplemental nutritional assistance
program and shifted new and ongoing financial responsibilities to the states;
(b) These federal changes are projected to, starting in state fiscal
year 2026-27, impose at least $50 million in new annual costs to the state
of Colorado to administer the supplemental nutritional assistance program
and, in future years, potentially impose additional costs to the state of
Colorado to provide a portion of the supplemental nutritional assistance
program benefits;
(c) The federal budget bill also reduced funding for
community-based outreach and application assistance in connection with
the supplemental nutrition assistance program, which play a critical role in
helping Coloradans access and retain program benefits;
(d) Outreach for the supplemental nutritional assistance program
promotes both equitable access and efficient, accurate administration of the
program, helping prevent avoidable payment errors while maintaining
access for all eligible people;
(e) The federal budget bill also eliminated the nation's only
dedicated nutrition education program for households that benefit from the
supplemental nutritional assistance program, ending over $6 million in
funding for Colorado and eliminating access to programs that are vital for
improving food security, dietary quality, and the ability to stretch limited
food budgets for 325,000 Coloradans including 30,000 families;
(f) The United States department of agriculture's data shows that for
every dollar spent on nutrition education, up to $10.64 is saved in
health-care spending;
(g) The supplemental nutritional assistance program education
directly reduces risk factors for conditions like diabetes, hypertension, and
obesity-chronic diseases that account for the bulk of health-care costs;
(h) Nutrition education is even more critical when families face
steeper food prices and changes to the supplemental nutritional assistance
program structure and eligibility that result in families needing support in
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 25B-003

doing more with less;
(i) Without investments in these programs, the hundreds of
thousands of Coloradans-including children, families, older adults, veterans,
and workers-who are eligible to receive supplemental nutritional assistance
program benefits are at risk of losing vital food assistance and more
Coloradans will go hungry;
(j) House Bill 25-1274 directed the secretary of state to submit
Proposition MM to the registered voters of the state to raise additional
revenue for the full implementation of the healthy school meals for all
program and its components, since the revenue raised in connection with
Proposition FF was insufficient to fund the full implementation of the
healthy school meals for all program and its components; and
(k) By modifying Proposition MM to support healthy food access
for Colorado kids and families and to allow excess money collected beyond
that necessary to fully fund and implement the healthy school meals for all
program to be used to support filling the gap in funding for the
supplemental nutritional assistance program caused by the reduced funding
for the program as a result of the federal budget bill, voter approval of
Proposition MM will ensure that all Coloradans have access to the
nutritious food they need to thrive.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-82.9-213, amend
(1) as follows:
22-82.9-213. Ballot issue related to Proposition FF revenue
increase - repeal. (1) At the statewide election held in November 2025, the
secretary of state shall submit to the registered electors of the state for their
approval or rejection the following ballot issue: "Shall state taxes be
increased by $95 million annually by a change to the Colorado Revised
Statutes that, to support the healthy school meals for all program, increases
TO SUPPORT ACCESS TO HEALTHY FOOD FOR COLORADO KIDS AND FAMILIES,
INCLUDING THE HEALTHY SCHOOL MEALS FOR ALL PROGRAM, AND, IN
CONNECTION THEREWITH, INCREASING state taxable income only for
individuals who have a federal tax TAXABLE income of $300,000 or more
by limiting itemized or standard state income tax deductions to $1,000 for
single tax return filers and $2,000 for joint tax return filers for the purposes
of fully funding the healthy school meals for all program to continue paying
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 25B-003

for public schools to offer free breakfast and lunch to all public school
students while also increasing wages for employees who prepare and serve
school meals, helping schools use basic, nutritious ingredients, instead of
processed products, and ensuring that Colorado grown and raised products
are part of school meals; SUPPORTING THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM (SNAP) THAT HELPS LOW-INCOME COLORADO
FAMILIES AFFORD GROCERIES; and shall the state be allowed ALLOWING THE
STATE to retain and spend as a voter-approved revenue change all additional
tax revenue generated by these tax deduction changes?"
Changes in Income Taxes Owed by Income Category
Income Category Proposed Change in Average
Income Tax Owed
$299,999 or less $0
$300,000 or more +$486
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-82.9-211, amend
as it will become effective if the ballot issue described in section
22-82.9-213 is approved by the people at the next statewide election
(1)(c), (3)(a) introductory portion, (3)(e) introductory portion, (3)(f)
introductory portion, and (3)(g); amend as it exists unless the ballot issue
described in section 22-82.9-212 is approved by the people at the next
statewide election and the ballot issue described in section 22-82.9-213
is rejected by the people at the next statewide election (3)(a)(IV); amend
(3)(a)(II) and (3)(a)(III); and add (3)(a)(VI), (3)(a)(VII), (3)(a)(VIII), and
(3)(j) as follows:
22-82.9-211. Healthy school meals for all program cash fund -
creation - uses - reporting requirements - legislative declaration -
definitions - repeal. (1) As used in this section, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(c) "Reserve calculation" means a calculation that determines the
amount expended by the department for the purposes described in
subsections (3)(a)(II), (3)(a)(III), (3)(a)(IV), (3)(a)(VI), (3)(a)(VII),
(3)(a)(VIII), and (3)(a.5) of this section in accordance with subsections
(3)(c) to (3)(g) of this section. The reserve calculation shall independently
be computed for subsections (3)(c) to (3)(g) of this section by legislative
council, in consultation with the department, and based on the relevant
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 25B-003

projections in the March economic and revenue forecast prepared by
legislative council staff. The computation of the reserve calculation for each
of subsections (3)(c) to (3)(g) of this section shall result in a percentage
equal to the anticipated balance in the fund as of the beginning of the fiscal
year plus any additional money that will be deposited in or transferred to the
fund over the course of the fiscal year minus the estimated amount of
money expended by the department for the purposes described in
subsections (3)(a) and (3)(a.5) of this section in accordance with the
subsection of this section for which the reserve calculation is computed
divided by the estimated amount expended by the department for the
purposes described in subsections (3)(a)(I) and (3)(a)(V) of this section in
accordance with the subsection of this section for which the reserve
calculation is computed.
(3) (a) Subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, the
department may expend money MAY BE EXPENDED from the fund that is not
in the account for the following purposes:
(II) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, awarding local food purchasing grants
pursuant to section 22-82.9-205;
(III) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, distributing money to a participating
school food authority to increase wages or provide stipends for individuals
whom the participating school food authority employs to directly prepare
and serve food for school meals pursuant to section 22-82.9-206 (1);
(IV) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, awarding local school food
purchasing technical assistance and education grants pursuant to section
22-82.9-207; and
(VI) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, IMPLEMENTING THE SUPPLEMENTAL
NUTRITIONAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM;
(VII) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, PROVIDING OUTREACH RELATED TO
THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITIONAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM; AND
(VIII) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, PROVIDING COMMUNITY-BASED
NUTRITION EDUCATION.
(e) If the department expending money from the fund as follows
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 25B-003

would result in a reserve calculation amount equal to or greater than
twenty-five percent and less than forty THIRTY-FIVE percent, then the
department shall expend money from the fund, including money in the
account in accordance with subsection (3)(a.5)(II) of this section, as
follows:
(f) If the department expending money from the fund as follows
would result in a reserve calculation amount equal to or greater than forty
THIRTY-FIVE percent, and, for state fiscal years commencing on or after July
1, 2029, less than fifty percent, then the department shall expend money
from the fund, including money in the account in accordance with
subsection (3)(a.5)(II) of this section, as follows:
(g) For fiscal years commencing on or after July 1, 2029, If, UPON
AWARDING MONEY ACCORDING TO SUBSECTION (3)(f) OF THIS SECTION, the
department determines that doing so AWARDING MONEY PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (3)(g) would result in a reserve calculation amount equal to
fifty THIRTY-FIVE percent or more, then the department shall expend money
MAY BE EXPENDED from the fund, including money in the account in
accordance with subsection (3)(a.5)(II) of this section by increasing the
amounts awarded and distributed from the fund to amounts greater than
those described in subsection (3)(f) of this section AWARDING AND
DISTRIBUTING AMOUNTS FROM THE FUND AS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION
(3)(f) OF THIS SECTION AND THEN FUNDING THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE
SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITIONAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM IN A MANNER THAT
SUPPLEMENTS AND DOES NOT SUPPLANT THE STATE'S EXPENDITURES, AS OF
JULY 1, 2025, TO IMPLEMENT THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITIONAL ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM; OUTREACH RELATED TO THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITIONAL
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM; AND COMMUNITY-BASED NUTRITION EDUCATION.
(j) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY LAW TO THE CONTRARY, MONEY IN THE
FUND SHALL ONLY BE EXPENDED FROM THE FUND IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTIONS (3)(c) THROUGH (3)(i) OF THIS SECTION ON OR AFTER JULY 1,
2026.
SECTION 4. Effective date. (1) Except as otherwise provided in
subsection (2) of this section, this act takes effect upon passage.
(2) Section 22-82.9-211 (1)(c), (3)(a) introductory portion, (3)(e)
introductory portion, (3)(f) introductory portion, (3)(g), (3)(a)(II),
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 25B-003

(3)(a)(III), (3)(a)(IV), (3)(a)(VI), (3)(a)(VII), (3)(a)(VIII), and (3)(j),
Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended and enacted in section 3 of this act,
take effect only if, at the November 2025 statewide election, the ballot issue
described in section 22-82.9-213, Colorado Revised Statutes, is approved
by the people, in which case section 22-82.9-211 (1)(c), (3)(a) introductory
portion, (3)(e) introductory portion, (3)(f) introductory portion, (3)(g),
(3)(a)(II), (3)(a)(III), (3)(a)(IV), (3)(a)(VI), (3)(a)(VII), (3)(a)(VIII), and
(3)(j), Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended and enacted in section 3 of
this act, take effect on the date of the official declaration of the vote thereon
by the governor.
SECTION 5. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 7-SENATE BILL 25B-003

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Connor Randall
SECRETARY OF ACTING CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 8-SENATE BILL 25B-003